California statutes. Education Code
(h) “Educational facility” means any property, facility, structure, equipment, or furnishings used or operated in conjunction with one or more public schools, including charter schools, or community colleges, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Classrooms.

(2) Auditoriums.

(3) Student
 centers.

(4) Administrative offices.

(5) Sports facilities.

(6) Maintenance, storage, or utility facilities.

(7) All necessary or usual attendant and related facilities and equipment, including streets, parking, and supportive service facilities or structures required or useful for the effective operation of the educational facility.

(i) “Participating party” means:

(1) A school district, charter school, county office of education, or community college district that undertakes, itself or through an agent, the financing or refinancing of a
 project or of working capital pursuant to this chapter.

(2) Any person, company, association, state or municipal government entity, partnership, firm, or other entity or group of entities that undertakes the financing or refinancing of a project pursuant to this chapter in conjunction with an entity described in paragraph (1).

(3) “Participating party” shall also be deemed to refer to the agent to the extent the agent is acting on behalf of the school district, charter school, county office of education, or community college district for any purpose of this chapter.

(4) For purposes of subdivision (d) of Section 17183,
 subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 17199.1, and Section 17199.4, “participating party” shall be deemed to refer to an entity described in paragraph (1) in conjunction with which an entity described in paragraph (2), if any, applied for financing from the authority.

(j) “Project” means the acquisition, construction, expansion, remodeling, renovation, improvement, furnishing, or equipping of an educational facility to be financed or refinanced pursuant to this chapter. “Project” may include reimbursement for the costs of acquisition, construction, expansion, remodeling, renovation, improvement, furnishing, or equipping of an educational facility to be financed or refinanced pursuant to this chapter, provided that reimbursement from bond proceeds is required to comply with federal tax law in accordance with an opinion of counsel
 that supports special treatment under federal tax law for the bonds issued for the applicable financing or refinancing. “Project” may include any combination of the foregoing undertaken jointly by any participating party with one or more other participating parties.

(k) “Working capital” means funds to be used by, or on behalf of, a participating party to pay maintenance or operating expenses, or any other costs that would be treated as an expense item under generally accepted accounting principles in connection with the ownership or operation of an educational facility, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Reserves for maintenance or operating expenses.

(2) Interest for a period not to exceed two years
 on any loan for working capital made pursuant to this chapter.

(3) Reserves for debt service, and any other costs necessary or incidental to, financing pursuant to this chapter.

(4) Payments made by a participating party for the rent or lease of an educational facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 416, Sec. 1.   (AB 1979)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

17174.

(a) The authority shall be comprised of the following members:

(1) The Treasurer, who shall serve as chairperson.

(2) The Director of the State Department of Finance.

(3) The Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(b) Each member of the authority may designate an individual from the member’s department or agency to act for the member and represent the member at all meetings.

(c) Members of the authority or their designees shall serve without compensation, but may be reimbursed by the authority for necessary and reasonable expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17175.

(a) Upon the first appointment of its members, and thereafter on or after March 31 of each year, the authority shall elect from its members a vice chairperson and a secretary-treasurer, who shall hold office until the following March 31, and shall continue to serve until their successors have been elected.

(b) On behalf of the authority, the chairperson shall appoint an executive director, who shall not be a member of the authority, and who shall serve at the pleasure of the authority. The executive director shall receive the compensation fixed for that purpose by the authority.

The authority may delegate to the executive director or any other official or employee of the authority any powers and duties that the authority deems proper, including, but not limited to, the power to enter into contracts on behalf of the authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 211, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

17176.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by subdivision (b), the Attorney General shall be the legal counsel for the authority.

(b) Upon the approval of the Attorney General, which shall not be unreasonably withheld, the authority may employ legal counsel as, in its judgment, is necessary or advisable to enable it to carry out the duties and functions of the authority pursuant to this chapter, including, but not limited to, the employment of bond counsel in connection with the issuance of bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17177.

The executive director or other person designated by resolution of the authority shall maintain a record of the proceedings of the authority, and shall be custodian of all books, documents, and papers filed with the authority, the minute book or journal of the authority, and its official seal. The executive director or the designee may cause copies to be made of all minutes and other records and documents of the authority, and may certify under the official seal of the authority that the copies are true copies, and all persons dealing with the authority may rely upon that certification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17178.

Two members of the authority shall constitute a quorum. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum shall be necessary for any action taken by the authority. A vacancy in the membership of the authority shall not impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the authority. Each meeting of the authority shall be open to the public and shall be held in accordance with Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Resolutions of the authority need not be published or posted. The authority may delegate by resolution to one or more of its members or its executive director any powers and duties as it may deem proper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17179.

The provisions of this chapter shall be administered by the authority, which shall have and is hereby vested with all powers reasonably necessary to carry out the powers and responsibilities expressly granted or imposed under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17180.

The authority is hereby authorized to do all of the following:

(a) Adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business.

(b) Adopt an official seal.

(c) Sue and be sued in its own name.

(d) Receive and accept gifts, grants, or donations of money for any of the purposes of this chapter from any of the following:

(1) A federal agency.

(2) A state agency.

(3) A municipality, county, or other political subdivision of the state.

(4) An individual, association, or corporation.

(e) Engage the services of private consultants to render professional and technical assistance and advice in carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

(f) (1) Determine the location and character of any project to be financed or refinanced under this chapter, and acquire, construct, enlarge, remodel, renovate, alter, improve, furnish, equip, own, maintain, manage, repair, operate, lease as lessee or lessor, or regulate the same.

(2) Designate a participating party as its agent, with authority to enter into contracts, for any of the purposes specified in
 paragraph (1).

(3) Enter into contracts for any of the purposes specified in paragraph (1).

(4) Enter into contracts for the management and operation of a project owned by the authority.

(g) Acquire, directly or by and through a participating party as its agent, by purchase solely from funds provided pursuant to this chapter, or by gift or devise, and sell, by installment or otherwise, property, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements, and other interests in lands, including, but not limited to, lands lying under water, and riparian rights, located within the state that the authority deems necessary or convenient for the acquisition, construction, financing, or operation of a project. The authority may do so upon the terms, and at the prices, it considers reasonable and upon which it can agree with the owner,
 and may take the title to the interest in the name of the authority or in the name of a participating party as its agent.

(h) Receive and accept from any source loans, contributions, or grants for, or in aid of, the construction, financing, or refinancing of all or part of a project, in the form of money, property, labor, or other things of value.

(i) Pursuant to an agreement between the authority and the participating party, make, directly or through a lending institution, secured or unsecured loans to
 a participating party, or purchase secured or unsecured loans from a participating party, or purchase all or part of any participating party’s rights to or possibilities regarding the state share of funding for school facilities approved by the State Allocation Board pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10). The purchase of all or part of any rights to, or possibilities regarding, the state contribution for funding for school facilities approved by the State Allocation Board shall be limited to amounts approved and funded or amounts approved but not yet funded from proceeds of state bonds already authorized by the electors but not yet issued. Loans or purchases completed pursuant to this section may be used to finance or refinance a
 project or provide working capital. A loan to finance or refinance a project shall not exceed the total cost of the project, as determined by the participating party and approved by the authority.

(j) Upon the terms and conditions the authority deems proper, lease a project being financed or refinanced pursuant to this chapter to a participating party, and charge and collect rent therefor. The authority may terminate a lease pursuant to this subdivision upon the lessee’s failure to comply with any of its obligations under the lease. The lease may include any of the following provisions:

(1) That the lessee shall have the option to renew the term of the lease for the period or periods, and at the rent, determined by the authority, or to purchase any or all of the project.

(2) That upon payment by the participating
 party of all of the indebtedness incurred by the authority for the financing of the project or for the refinancing of the participating party’s outstanding indebtedness, the authority may convey any or all of the project to the lessee or lessees, with or without further consideration.

(k) Charge and equitably apportion among participating parties its administrative costs and expenses incurred pursuant to this chapter.

(l) (1) Obtain, or aid in obtaining, from any state or federal agency or any private company, any insurance, guarantee, letter, or line of credit regarding, or of, or for, the payment or repayment of all or part of the interest, principal, or both, on any loan, lease, or obligation, or any instrument evidencing or securing the same, made or entered into pursuant to this chapter, or on any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, enter into any agreement, contract, or any other instrument regarding any insurance, guarantee, letter, or line of credit specified in paragraph (1), and accept payment in the manner and form provided in the agreement, contract, or instrument if a participating party defaults.

(3) Assign any insurance, guarantee, letter, or line of credit specified in paragraph (1) as security for bonds issued by the authority.

(m) Enter into any
 agreements or contracts, including, but not limited to, agreements for liquidity or credit enhancement, execute any instruments, and any other act or thing necessary, convenient, or desirable for the purposes of the authority or to carry out any express power granted the authority pursuant to this chapter.

(n) At the discretion of the authority, invest any moneys held in reserve or in sinking funds, or any moneys not required for immediate use or disbursement, in obligations authorized by the resolution authorizing the bonds secured by the investment, or by law governing the investment of trust funds in the custody of the Treasurer.

(o) Adopt guidelines for grants, bonds, and other evidences of indebtedness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 38, Sec. 31.   (SB 1016)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

17180.5.

(a) In addition to the powers authorized pursuant to Section 17180, the authority shall perform its duties under the Charter School Facilities Program to provide funding for facilities for charter school pupils as set forth in Article 12 (commencing with Section 17078.50) of Chapter 12.5.

(b) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, including, but not limited to, Section 17197, with regard to the authority’s implementation of funding for charter school facilities, Article 12 (commencing with Section 17078.50) shall control over conflicting provisions, if any, in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 935, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

17181.

(a) The California School Finance Authority Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury, to be administered by the authority. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal year for the purposes of this chapter. The authority may pledge any or all of the moneys in the fund as security for payment of the principal of, and interest on, any particular issuance of bonds pursuant to this chapter. For that purpose, or as necessary or convenient to the accomplishment of any other purpose of this chapter, the authority may divide the fund into separate accounts. All moneys accruing to the authority pursuant to this chapter from any source shall be deposited in the fund.

(b) Subject to any priorities created by the pledge of particular moneys in the fund to secure any issuance of bonds of the authority, and to reasonable administrative costs incurred by the authority in implementing this chapter, all moneys in the fund, regardless of the source, shall be held in trust for the security and payment of bonds of the authority, and shall not be used or pledged for any other purpose while any bonds are outstanding and unpaid. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to limit the power of the authority to make loans with bond proceeds in accordance with the terms of the resolution authorizing the issuance of those bonds.

(c) Pursuant to any agreements with the holders of particular bonds pledging any particular assets, revenues, or moneys, the authority may create separate accounts in the fund to manage the assets, revenues, or moneys in the manner prescribed by the agreements.

(d) From time to time, the authority may direct the Treasurer to do any of the following:

(1) Invest moneys in the fund which are not required for its current needs, including, but not limited to, proceeds from the sale of any bonds in eligible securities specified in Section 16430 of the Government Code and designated by the authority, or in any other securities or obligations designated by the authority, in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds payable or secured by the moneys.

(2) Deposit moneys in the fund in interest bearing accounts in state or national banks or other financial institutions having principal offices in the state. 

(3) Transfer moneys in the fund to the Surplus Money Investment Fund for investment pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 16470) of Chapter 3 of Part 4 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

Notwithstanding Section 16305.7 of the Government Code, all interest or other earnings resulting from an investment or deposit pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited in the fund.

(e) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d), no moneys in the fund shall be subject to transfer to any other fund pursuant to any provision of Part 2 (commencing with Section 16300) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17182.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), all expenses incurred by the authority in implementing this chapter shall be payable solely from funds appropriated for purposes of this chapter, and the authority shall not incur liabilities in excess of the amount of those funds.

(b) The authority may request a loan by the Pooled Money Investment Board from the Pooled Money Investment Account, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, and may execute those documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. The loan shall be deposited in the fund for the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this chapter. The amount of the loan shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that the authority by resolution, has authorized to be sold for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 893, Sec. 92.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17183.

(a) From time to time, the authority, by resolution, may issue its revenue bonds in order to provide funds for any of the purposes of this chapter. Bonds may be issued to finance or refinance any of the following:

(1) A single project or financing of working capital for a single participating party.

(2) A series of projects or financings of working capital for
 a single participating party.

(3) A single project or financing of working capital for several participating parties.

(4) Several projects or financings of working capital for several participating parties.

(5) A joint venture school facilities construction project undertaken pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 17060) of Chapter 12.

(b) Except as otherwise expressly provided by the authority, all revenue bonds shall be payable from any available revenues or moneys of the authority not otherwise pledged, subject only to any agreements with
 holders of particular bonds or notes pledging any particular revenue or moneys. Notwithstanding that revenue bonds issued pursuant to this section may be payable from a special fund, the revenue bonds shall be, and shall be deemed to be for all purposes, negotiable instruments, subject only to the provisions of the revenue bonds for registration.

(c) The revenue bonds of the authority may be issued as serial bonds, term bonds, or the authority, in its discretion, may issue bonds of both types. The issuance shall be in accordance with the indenture, trust agreement, or resolution relating to the revenue bonds, which shall provide all of the following:

(1) The date or dates of the bonds.

(2) The date or dates upon which the bonds will mature, not to exceed 40 years from their respective dates.

(3) The interest rate or rates, or methods of determining the interest rate or rates, of the bonds.

(4) When the bonds are payable.

(5) The denominations of the bonds.

(6) The form of the bonds, which shall be either bearer or registered.

(7) The registration privileges of the bonds.

(8) The manner in which the bonds are to be executed.

(9) The place or places at which the bonds shall be payable in lawful money of the United States of America.

(10) The terms of redemption of the bonds.

(d) After giving due consideration to the recommendations of the participating party or parties, the revenue bonds of the authority shall be sold by the Treasurer at either a public or private sale at a price or prices, and upon the terms and conditions prescribed by the authority. The revenue bonds of the authority may be sold at, above, or below the par value of the bonds.

(e) Pending the preparation of the definitive bonds, the authority may issue interim receipts or certificates or temporary bonds that shall be exchanged for the definitive bonds.

(f) Any resolution authorizing the issuance of any bonds of the authority, or any issue of revenue bonds of the authority, may include any of the following provisions:

(1) Provisions pledging all or any part
 of the proceeds of the bonds or revenue of a project or loan.

(2) Provisions concerning the replacement of mutilated, destroyed, stolen, or lost bonds.

(3) Provisions specifying insurance to be maintained on the project and the authorized uses of the proceeds of the insurance.

(4) Covenants against the mortgaging or otherwise encumbering, selling, leasing, pledging, placing a charge upon, or otherwise disposing of the project before the payment of the bonds issued to finance the project.

(5) Provisions specifying the events of default, terms upon which the
 bonds may be declared due before maturity, and the terms upon which the declaration and its consequences may be waived.

(6) The rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the breach of any covenants, conditions, or obligations.

(7) Vesting of the right to enforce covenants in a trustee.

(8) The terms upon which all or any percentage of the bondholders may enforce covenants or duties.

(9) Procedures for amending the terms of the resolution, with or without the consent of the holders of a specified number of bonds.

(10) Provision for any other acts or things deemed necessary, convenient, or desirable by the authority to secure the bonds or improve their marketability.

(g) The validity of the authorization and issuance of any bond issue shall not be affected by proceedings for the acquisition, construction, or improvement of any project, or by contracts relating to those proceedings. Any resolution authorizing the issuance of any bonds of the authority may provide authorization for the bonds to bear a statement certifying that they are issued pursuant to this chapter. Bonds bearing that statement shall be conclusively deemed valid and issued in conformity with this chapter. Reference on the face of the bonds to the resolution by its date of adoption shall incorporate the provisions of the resolution and of this chapter into the terms of the bonds.

(h) Members of the authority, or any person executing the revenue bonds of the authority, shall not incur personal liability on the bonds, nor shall these persons incur personal liability or
 accountability by reason of the issuance of the revenue bonds of the authority.

(i) The authority is authorized, out of any funds available for that purpose, to purchase revenue bonds of the authority. The authority may hold, pledge, cancel, or resell any bonds purchased under the authority of this subdivision, subject to, and in accordance with, agreements with bondholders.

(j) The financing or refinancing of projects or working capital may be provided pursuant to this chapter by means other than revenue bonds, at the discretion of the authority, including financing or refinancing through certificates of participation, or other interests, in bonds, loans, leases, installment sales, or other agreements of the participating party or parties. In this connection, the authority may do all things and execute and deliver all documents and instruments as may be necessary or desirable
 with regard to issuance of the certificates of participation or other means of financing or refinancing.

(k) The authority may by resolution issue its revenue bonds in the form of commercial paper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 38, Sec. 32.   (SB 1016)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

17183.5.

In enacting this chapter, it is the intent of the Legislature to provide financing only for projects demonstrated by the participating party to be financially feasible. In demonstrating financial feasibility, the participating party may take into account all of its funds, and may base future projections upon historical experience or reasonable expectations, or a combination thereof. Nothing in this section shall be construed to imply that any project is required to produce revenue in order to be financed under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 325, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17184.

(a) In the discretion of the authority, any revenue bonds of the authority issued under this chapter may be secured by a trust agreement, or by indenture by and between the authority and a corporate trustee or trustees, including the Treasurer or any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or outside the state.

(b) Any trust agreement, indenture, or any resolution providing for the issuance of bonds of the authority, may pledge or assign the proceeds of the bonds, and the revenues to be received by, a participating party or parties.

(c) Any trust agreement, indenture, or resolution providing for the issuance of revenue bonds of the authority may include any provisions for the protection of, and the enforcement of the rights and remedies of, bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of any law, including provisions included in any resolution or resolutions of the authority provided under subdivision (a) or (b).

(d) Any trust agreement or indenture may prescribe the rights and remedies of the bondholders, and of the trustee or trustees, and may restrict the individual right of action of the bondholders.

(e) Any trust agreement, indenture, or resolution may include any other provisions deemed by the authority to be reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Treasurer shall not be deemed to have a conflict of interest by reason of his or her capacity as trustee pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 325, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17185.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, revenue bonds issued under this chapter are not and shall not be deemed to constitute a debt or liability of the state, or any political subdivision thereof, and are not and shall not be deemed to be a pledge of the faith and credit of the state, or any political subdivision thereof, other than the authority. Revenue bonds of the authority shall be payable solely from funds provided under this chapter.

(b) Each revenue bond of the authority shall include a statement on the face of the bond that neither the State of California nor the authority is obligated to pay the principal or interest thereon, except from revenues of the authority, and shall also include a statement that neither the faith or credit, nor the taxing power of the State of California, or any political subdivision, is pledged to the payment of the principal or interest of the bonds.

(c) The issuance of revenue bonds under this chapter shall not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate the state, or any political subdivision thereof, to levy or pledge any form of taxation, or make any appropriation for their payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 325, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17186.

(a) Any holder of revenue bonds issued under this chapter, or any coupons appertaining thereto, or the trustee or trustees under any trust agreement, indenture, or resolution, may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus, or other proceedings, protect and enforce any rights conferred under state law, by this chapter, or under the terms of any trust agreement, indenture, or resolution, except to the extent that these rights may be otherwise restricted by any resolution authorizing the issuance of these bonds, or by any trust agreement or indenture securing these bonds.

(b) Any holder of revenue bonds issued under this chapter, or any coupons appertaining thereto, or the trustee or trustees under any trust agreement, indenture, or resolution, may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required under this chapter, or by any trust agreement, indenture, or resolution, to be performed by the authority, or by any officer, employee, or agent of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17187.

All moneys received under this chapter, whether received as proceeds from the sale of revenue bonds or as revenues, are trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this chapter. Any officer, bank, or trust company with whom those moneys have been deposited, shall act as trustee of those moneys and shall hold and apply them for those purposes, subject to the requirements of this chapter and the resolution authorizing the bonds of any issue, or the trust agreement or indenture securing those bonds, may provide.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17188.

(a) The authority may provide for the issuance of the revenue bonds of the authority for the purpose of refunding any bonds, or any series or issue of the revenue bonds of the authority then outstanding, and may include the payment of any redemption premium for those bonds and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption and purchase or maturity of those bonds.

(b) The proceeds of any bonds issued for the purpose of refunding of outstanding bonds may, in the discretion of the authority, be applied to the purchase or redemption prior to maturity or retirement at maturity of the outstanding bonds on their earliest or any subsequent redemption date or upon the purchase or at the maturity thereof, or paid to a third person to assume the authority’s obligation to make those payments, and may, pending that application, be placed in escrow to be applied to the purchase or retirement at maturity or redemption on any date or dates as may be determined by the authority.

(c) Any escrowed proceeds, pending such use may be invested and reinvested in obligations or securities authorized by resolution of the authority, maturing at any time or times as shall be appropriate to assure the prompt payment, as to principal, interest, and redemption premium, if any, of the outstanding bonds to be so refunded. The interest, income and profits, if any, earned or realized on any investment may also be applied to the payment of the outstanding bonds to be so refunded or of interest in the refunding bonds. After the terms of the escrow have been fully satisfied and carried out, any balance of proceeds and interest, income profits, if any, earned or realized on the investments thereof may be returned to the authority for use by it in any lawful manner.

(d) All refunding bonds are subject to the provisions of this chapter, in the same manner and to the same extent, as other bonds issued pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17189.

(a) Revenue bonds issued by the authority under this chapter shall be designated as securities in which all banks, bankers, savings banks, trust companies, and other persons engaged in a banking business; all insurance companies, insurance associations, and other persons carrying on an insurance business; any administrators, executors, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries; and any other persons who are now or who may hereafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of the state, may properly and legally invest any funds, including capital belonging to them or within their control.

(b) Revenue bonds issued by the authority under this chapter, other notes or securities, or obligations are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with, and received by, any state or municipal officer, or agency of the state for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of the state are, or may hereafter be, authorized by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17190.

(a) Any bonds issued under this chapter, their transfer, and income therefrom shall at all times be free from taxation of every kind by the state and by all political subdivisions of the state.

(b) The authority is not required to pay any taxes or assessments upon, or with respect to, any project or property acquired by or for the authority under this chapter, or upon any income therefrom, or on or from any other assets or operations of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17191.

(a) The State of California pledges and agrees with the holders of the bonds issued pursuant to this chapter, and with those parties who may enter into contracts with the authority pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, that the state will not limit, alter, or restrict the rights hereby vested in the authority to finance educational facilities. The State of California pledges and agrees to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the holders of bonds authorized by this chapter, and with the parties who may enter into contracts with the authority pursuant to this chapter, and pledges and agrees not to impair the rights or remedies of the holders of any revenue bonds or any parties until the bonds, together with interest, are fully paid and discharged and any contracts are fully performed on the part of the authority.

(b) The authority shall have the right to include the pledges made pursuant to this section in its revenue bonds and contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17192.

(a) Pledges by or to the authority of revenues, moneys, accounts, accounts receivable, contract rights, or other rights to payment of any other kind made by or to the authority pursuant to this chapter shall be valid and binding from the time the pledge is made for the benefit of the pledges, and the successors thereto.

(b) The revenues, moneys, accounts, accounts receivable, and other rights to payment of any other kind pledged by or to the authority or its assignees, shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without physical delivery, or any further act. The lien of any pledge shall be valid and binding against all parties, irrespective of whether the parties have notice of the claim. The trust agreement, indenture, resolution, or other instrument by which any pledge is created need not be recorded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17193.

(a) The authority shall fix, revise, charge, and collect rents for the use of each project owned by the authority, and may contract with any person, partnership, association, corporation, or other body, whether public or private, for that purpose. Any lease entered into by the authority with a participating party, and each agreement, note, or other instrument evidencing the obligations of a participating party to the authority, shall provide that the rents or principal, interest, and other charges payable by the participating party shall be sufficient to provide for all of the following:

(1) To pay the principal, sinking fund payments, if any, premiums, if any, and the interest on outstanding bonds of the authority issued in respect of the project when due and payable.

(2) To create and maintain reserves that may, but need not necessarily be required or provided for, in the resolution relating to the revenue bonds of the authority.

(3) To pay its share of the administrative costs and expenses of the authority.

(b) The authority shall pledge the revenues derived and to be derived from a project or from a participating party for the purposes specified in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (a). The authority may issue additional revenue bonds that may be ranked on a parity with other bonds relating to the project to the extent, and under the terms and conditions provided, in the bond resolution.

(c) The authority and a participating party may include in any lease or agreement between them or with a credit provider any terms and conditions relating to insurance, liquidity, or credit enhancement of the bonds, or any other lawful terms and conditions the authority deems necessary or desirable to facilitate the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 325, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17194.

The authority may authorize any participating party to act as its agent in the performance of acts specifically approved by the authority, and all acts required under Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) of Chapter 3 of Part 10.5. The authorizations may include, but are not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(a) The selection of school or college sites.

(b) The securing of appraisals.

(c) Contracts for architectural services.

(d) The advertisement for construction bids and the entry into contracts for construction.

(e) The purchase of furniture and equipment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 325, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

17195.
